apertium-dan.dan.dix
<pardef n="cp-only-L\s" c="cp-only-L, for forms that can only start compounds">
   <e r="RL"><p><l>s</l>          <r><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>          <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>s-</l>         <r><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>s-</l>         <r><s n="gen"/><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case" c="cp-L and cp-R. Analyse both -Ø- and -s- in compounds, generate -Ø- if cp-L">
   <e>       <p><l></l>   <r></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>   <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>  <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>s</l>  <r><s n="gen"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\'__case" c="As above, but with ' in the genitive case.">
   <e>       <p><l></l>   <r></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>   <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>  <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>'</l>  <r><s n="gen"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cp-both\s_LR_Ø\S__case" c="cp-L and cp-R. Analyse both -Ø- and -s- in compounds, generate -s- if cp-L">
   <e>       <p><l></l>   <r></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>   <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>  <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>s</l>  <r><s n="gen"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cp-both\s_LR_Ø\'__case" c="As above, but with ' in the genitive case">
   <e>       <p><l></l>   <r></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>   <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>  <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>'</l>  <r><s n="gen"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cp-both\e_LR_Ø\S__case" c="cp-L and cp-R. Analyse -Ø- and -e- in compounds, generate -e- if cp-L">
  <!-- can't use cp-R on the nom/acc here since cmp has e while unmarked as Ø -->
   <e>       <p><l></l>   <r></r></p></e>
   <e r="RL"><p><l>e</l>  <r><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>   <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>  <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
   <e >      <p><l>e-</l> <r><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>   <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>s</l>  <r><s n="gen"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>


    <!-- Punctuation  -->

<pardef n="numeros">
<!-- separate out the number 1 as singular (fortunately "1.00" is usually plural!) -->
<e>       <re>1</re><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <re>[02-9]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <re>[0-9][0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <re>[0-9][.,][0-9]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

<e r="RL"><re>([§\+–] ?)?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)*([ \-]+[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)*)*( *%)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <re>[½¹²³¼¾]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>


</pardef>


<pardef n="separa">
  <e>       <p><l>..</l>        <r>..<s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>...</l>       <r>...<s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[.\?;:!…¿¶]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="aposchar">
<e>       <i>'</i></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cometa">
<e>       <par n="aposchar"/><p><l></l><r><s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="coma">
  <e>       <re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/><s n="clb"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="paresq">
  <e>       <re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pardret">
  <e>       <re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


    <!-- Adjectives -->



<pardef n="rap__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>pere</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>p</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pe</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pe</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>peste</l>     <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pest</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bund/et__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nere</l>      <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>neste</l>     <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nest</l>      <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="and/en__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="første__adj_ord">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="and/en__adj_ord">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>      <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>      <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>      <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>      <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="anden">                     <i>and</i><par n="and/en__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bundet">                    <i>bund</i><par n="bund/et__adj"/></e>
<e lm="knap">                     <i>knap</i><par n="rap__adj"/></e>
<e lm="oprevet">                  <i>oprev</i><par n="bund/et__adj"/></e>
<e lm="specialskrevet">            <i>specialskrev</i><par n="bund/et__adj"/></e>
<e lm="anden">                 <i>and</i><par n="and/en__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="attende">               <i>attende</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="ellevte">               <i>ellevte</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="femte">                 <i>femte</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="femtende">              <i>femtende</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="firsindstyvende">       <i>firsindstyvende</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="fjerde">                <i>fjerde</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="fjortende">             <i>fjortende</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="fyrretyvende">          <i>fyrretyvende</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="første">                <i>første</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="halvfemsindstyvende">   <i>halvfemsindstyvende</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="halvfjerdsindstyvende"> <i>halvfjerdsindstyvende</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="halvtredsindstyvende">  <i>halvtredsindstyvende</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="millionte">             <i>millionte</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="niende">                <i>niende</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="nittende">              <i>nittende</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="ottende">               <i>ottende</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="sekstende">             <i>sekstende</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="sjette">                <i>sjette</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="syttende">              <i>syttende</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="syvende">               <i>syvende</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="tiende">                <i>tiende</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="tiuende">               <i>tiuende</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="tolvte">                <i>tolvte</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="tredivte">              <i>tredivte</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="tredje">                <i>tredje</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="tresindstyvende">       <i>tresindstyvende</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="trettende">             <i>trettende</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="trættende">             <i>trættende</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="tusinde">               <i>tusinde</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="tyvende">               <i>tyvende</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="åttende">               <i>åttende</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="åttiende">              <i>åttiende</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e lm="hundrede">              <i>hundrede</i><par n="første__adj_ord"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="separa"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="numeros"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="coma"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="cometa"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="paresq"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="pardret"/></e>
